Illinois, session 104th, HB487.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Redistricting Act of 2021 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 92/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8General Assembly Redistricting Act of 2021.9(Source: P.A. 102-10, eff. 6-4-21.)